en: Sheep carcass
fr: Carcasse de mouton

en: Frozen sheep meat
fr: Viande de mouton surgelée

en: Ground sheep meat
fr: Viande de mouton hachée

en: Frozen ground sheep meat
fr: Viande de mouton hachée surgelée

en: Lamb meat, lamb, lambs
bg: Агнешко месо
de: Lammfleisch, Lamm, Lämmer
es: Carne de cordero
fi: lampaan liha
fr: Viandes d’agneau, agneau, agneaux
hr: Janjetina
it: Carne di agnello, Agnello
ja: ラム肉
nl: Schapevlezen
pl: Jagnięcina
zh: 羊肉, 羊, 羊羔, 羊羔肉

en: Cooked lamb meat
fr: Viandes d'agneau cuites, Viande d'agneau cuite

en: Frozen lamb meat
fr: Viandes d'agneau surgelées, Viande d'agneau surgelée

en: Lamb fat
fr: Graisse d'agneau, gras d'agneau

en: Frozen lamb fat
fr: Graisse d'agneau surgelée, gras d'agneau surgelé

en: Lamb chop
fr: Côtes d'agneau, Côte d'agneau

en: Lamb rack
fr: Carrés d'agneau, carré d'agneau

en: Frozen lamb rack
fr: Carrés d'agneau surgelés, carré d'agneau surgelé

en: Cooked lamb chops, Cooked lamb chop
fr: Côtes d'agneau cuites, Côtelettes d'agneau cuites, Côte d'agneau cuite, Côtelette d'agneau cuite

en: Grilled lamb chops, Grilled lamb chop
fr: Côtes d'agneau grillées, Côtelettes d'agneau grillées, Côtes d'agneau poêlées, Côtelettes d'agneau poêlées, Côte d'agneau grillée, Côte d'agneau poêlée, Côtelette d'agneau poêlée

en: Grilled lamb cutlet
fr: Côtelette d'agneau grillée

en: Lamb cutlet
fr: Côtelette d'agneau

en: Lamb sweetbread
fr: Ris d'agneau

en: Cooked lamb sweetbread
fr: Ris d'agneau cuit

en: Lamb chop fillet
fr: Filet de côte d'agneau

en: Grilled lamb chop fillet, Pan-fried lamb chop fillet
fr: Côte de filet d'agneau grillée, Côte de filet d'agneau poêlée